Wyoming, session 2025, SF0006.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 1-21-1401 through 1-21-1403 and
6-5-309 are created to read:
ARTICLE 14
REMOVAL OF UNAUTHORIZED OCCUPANTS
1-21-1401. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(i) "Immediate family member" means a spouse,
child or parent;
(ii) "Law enforcement" means the sheriff, the
sheriff's deputies or peace officers of a city or town;
(iii) "Owner" means the owner of a residential
dwelling;
(iv) "Residential dwelling" means a dwelling or
property, real or otherwise, that serves as a place of
residence or other facilities held out for the occupancy of
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
a person. "Residential dwelling" includes real property
where a dwelling or other residential facility is located;
(v) "Unauthorized person" means a person who is
not authorized to maintain presence or residency in a
residential dwelling.
1-21-1402. Limited alternative remedy for removal of
unauthorized persons from residential property.
(a) An owner or the owner's authorized agent may
request from law enforcement in the county where the
property is located the immediate removal of any person
unlawfully occupying or possessing the owner's residential
dwelling if all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The person requesting the removal is the
residential dwelling owner or the owner's authorized agent;
(ii) The unauthorized person for whom removal
has been requested has unlawfully entered and remains or
continues to reside in the owner's residential dwelling;
(iii) There is no known pending litigation
related to the residential dwelling between the owner and
any known unauthorized person;
(iv) The unauthorized person is not a current or
former tenant pursuant to a written or oral rental or lease
agreement authorized by the owner, the owner's predecessor
or the owner's authorized agent;
(v) The unauthorized person is not an immediate
family member of the owner or in a cohabitating
relationship with the owner.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(b) To request the immediate removal of an
unauthorized person who is occupying a residential
dwelling, the owner or the owner's authorized agent shall
submit to law enforcement of the county where the
residential dwelling is located a complaint for the removal
of the unauthorized person. The complaint shall include, at
a minimum, that:
(i) The person is the owner or the owner's
authorized agent for the residential dwelling;
(ii) An unauthorized person has unlawfully
entered and is remaining or residing unlawfully in the
residential dwelling;
(iii) The unauthorized person sought to be
removed is not an owner or co-owner of the residential
dwelling and has not been listed on title to the property
unless the person has engaged in title fraud;
(iv) There is no known litigation related to the
property that is pending between the owner and any person
sought to be removed;
(v) The unauthorized person is not a current or
former tenant pursuant to a written or oral rental or lease
agreement authorized by the owner, the owner's predecessor
or the owner's authorized agent;
(vi) The unauthorized person is not an immediate
family member of the owner or in a cohabitating
relationship with the owner;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vii) The owner acknowledges that an
unauthorized person removed from the property or dwelling
under this section may bring a cause of action against the
owner for any false statements made in the complaint, or
for wrongfully using this procedure, and that as a result
of this action, the owner may be held liable for actual
damages, penalties, costs and reasonable attorney fees;
(viii) The owner is requesting law enforcement
to immediately remove the unauthorized person from the
residential dwelling;
(ix) A copy of the owner's valid
government-issued identification or a copy of documents
authorizing the owner's authorized agent to act on the
owner's behalf is included;
(x) The information contained in the complaint
is true and correct and that the complaint is submitted
under penalty of perjury.
(c) Upon receipt of a complaint under this section,
law enforcement shall verify that the person who submitted
the complaint is the record owner of the residential
dwelling or the authorized agent of the owner and that the
person is entitled to relief under this section. If law
enforcement is unable to verify that the person who
submitted the complaint is the record owner of the
residential dwelling and is entitled to relief under this
section, law enforcement shall have no obligation to
provide notice and vacate the residential dwelling as
provided in subsection (d) of this section.
(d) Upon verification under subsection (c) of this
section, law enforcement shall, without delay, provide
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
notice to immediately vacate to all unauthorized persons
occupying the residential dwelling and shall put the owner
in possession of the residential dwelling. Notice may be
accomplished by hand delivery of the notice to the
unauthorized occupant or by posting the notice on the front
door or entrance of the residential dwelling. Law
enforcement shall also attempt to verify the identities of
all persons occupying the residential dwelling and shall
document the identities. If appropriate, law enforcement
may arrest any person found in the residential dwelling for
trespass, outstanding warrants or any other legal cause.
1-21-1403. Vacation of unauthorized persons; cause of
action for wrongful removal.
(a) After law enforcement provides notice to
immediately vacate, the owner or the owner's authorized
agent may request that law enforcement stand by to keep the
peace while the owner or agent changes the locks and
removes the personal property of the unauthorized person
from the premises to or near the property line.
(b) Law enforcement shall not be liable to the
unauthorized person or any other party for the loss,
destruction or damage of property removed under this
section. The owner or the owner's authorized agent shall
not be liable to an unauthorized person or any other party
for the loss, destruction or damage to any removed personal
property unless the removal was wrongful or unless the
personal property is wantonly destroyed or damaged.
(c) A person may bring a civil cause of action
against an owner or the owner's authorized agent for
wrongful removal. A person harmed by a wrongful removal
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
under this article may be restored to possession of the
residential dwelling and may recover:
(i) Actual costs and damages incurred;
(ii) Statutory damages equal to triple the fair
market value of renting the residential dwelling during the
period of wrongful removal;
(iii) Court costs;
(iv) Reasonable attorney fees.
(d) Nothing in this article shall be construed to
limit:
(i) The rights of an owner;
(ii) The authority of any peace officer to
arrest an unauthorized person for trespassing, vandalism,
theft or any other criminal offense;
(iii) Remedies available under title 1, chapter
21 of the Wyoming statute or any other provision of law.
6-5-309. Unlawful advertising or providing false
documents for fraudulently conveying or leasing real
property; penalties.
(a) Any person who, with the intent to detain or
remain on real property or in a residential dwelling,
knowingly presents to another person a false document
purporting to be a valid lease agreement, deed or other
instrument conveying real property rights shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
than six (6) months, a fine not to exceed seven hundred
fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.
(b) Any person who lists or advertises residential
real property for sale knowing that the purported seller
has no legal title or authority to sell the property, or
who rents or leases the property to another person knowing
that he has no lawful ownership or leasehold interest in
the property, shall be guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine not to
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.
Section 2. W.S. 6-3-201(b)(i) and by creating a new
paragraph (iv) is amended to read:
6-3-201. Property destruction and defacement;
grading; penalties; aggregated costs or values.
(b) Property destruction and defacement is:
(i) Except as provided in paragraph (iv) of this
subsection, a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for
not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven
hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the cost of
restoring injured property or the value of the property if
destroyed is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00);
(iv) A felony punishable by imprisonment for not
more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the person
unlawfully detains or occupies a residential dwelling as
defined by W.S. 1-21-1401(a)(iv) and who knowingly defaces,
injures or destroys property in or on the residential
dwelling, regardless of the cost of restoring the injured
property or the value of the property if destroyed.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0006
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
8